Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1395.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 14.1 of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, is amended to read:Section 14.1. Preemption.--(a) Except as set forth in subsection (b), this act shall preempt and supersede any local ordinance or rule concerning the subject matter of this act.(b) This section does not prohibit local regulation pursuant to an ordinance which was adopted by:(1) a municipality prior to January 1, 2006, and which remained in effect on January 1, 2006[.]; or(2) a county after the effective date of this paragraph.123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1395PN1852 - 2 - 1